Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
CITY AND COUNTY OF DENVER

30-11-201. Merger not to affect pending actions.

No action or proceeding to which any municipality merged into the city and county of Denver is a party or in which it is in any way interested shall abate by reason of such merger, but the same shall survive and be prosecuted to a conclusion under its title as borne by it at the time of such merger; and any judgment or decree entered therein shall be enforceable by or against the city and county of Denver to the full extent of the interest or liability of the said municipality so merged, the same as if said city and county of Denver were expressly made a party thereto. No right or cause of action by or against any such municipality so merged shall be lost or extinguished by reason of such merger, and the same shall be thereafter enforced and prosecuted by or against the city and county of Denver.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 167, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2080.

C.L.

§ 8969.

CSA:

C. 53, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-1.

30-11-202. Laws applicable. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 168, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2081.

C.L.

§ 8970.

CSA:

C. 53, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-2.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 914, § 22, effective August 6.

30-11-203. Records concerning charter amendment.

It is the duty of the secretary of state to carefully preserve all certified charters and charter amendments and measures, and the record of votes thereon, that come to his office under the operation of the constitutional amendment creating the city and county of Denver. He shall publish them in the next ensuing volume of the session laws of the state. The originals, during office hours, shall be open to the inspection of the public.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 168, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2082.

C.L.

§ 8971.

CSA:

C. 53, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-3.

30-11-204. Channel of Platte river - improvement.

The city council of the city and county of Denver is authorized to improve, change, straighten, widen, narrow, deepen, or extend the channel of the South Platte river within the city and county of Denver.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 198, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8974.

CSA:

C. 53, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-6.

30-11-205. City to control channel.

The width, depth, course, and dimensions of said channel shall be as established by ordinance duly enacted by the council of the city and county of Denver, and said city and county has the power to acquire by purchase or condemnation all lands necessary to improve, straighten, widen, narrow, deepen, or extend said channel, and the public works department has exclusive control of the construction of said improvement.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 198, § 2.

C.L.

§ 8975.

CSA:

C. 53, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-7.

30-11-206. Improvement of channel beyond city limits.

The city and county of Denver is empowered to extend and improve said channel beyond and outside the limits of the city and county of Denver when in the opinion of the council of said city and county the extension and improvement of said channel beyond the boundary line of said city and county shall more effectually and advantageously accomplish the purpose and object of sections 30-11-204 to 30-11-207, and cause said improvement to be more beneficial to the inhabitants of the city and county of Denver and promote and protect the general health and general welfare.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 199, § 3.

C.L.

§ 8976.

CSA:

C. 53, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-8.

30-11-207. Obstructions or pollutions.

The city council of the city and county of Denver may enact and adopt ordinances for the purpose of preventing and removing obstructions in said channel or encroachments upon the same or polluting the waters thereof; and to in every manner control, regulate, and protect said property when improved in whole or in part, and provide for a penalty for the violation of any of said ordinances.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 199, § 4.

C.L.

§ 8977.

CSA:

C. 53, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 36-18-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-18-9.

30-11-208. Contract - teleconferencing facilities and services - repeal.

The city and county of Denver may enter into a contract with the state telecommunications director pursuant to the provisions of section 24-37.5-503, C.R.S., for the providing of teleconferencing facilities and services between the city and county of Denver and any other county or state agency to be used for teleconferencing of hearings relating to any person in the custody of the city and county of Denver.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 807, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 17, effective May 22.

L. 2022:

(2) added on revision, (HB 22-1353), ch. 479, pp. 3498, 3499, §§ 9, 12.

Cross references:

(1) For the authority of the board of county commissioners to enter into a contract for teleconferencing facilities and services, see § 30-11-107 (1)(x).

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1353, see section 1 of chapter 479, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.